Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIV Public Utilities
Motor Carrier Advisory Committee

281.900.
Kentucky Motor Carrier Advisory Committee — Membership.

The Kentucky Motor Carrier Advisory Committee is created as an agency of the Commonwealth to carry out the functions and duties conferred upon it by KRS

281.905

.

The committee shall consist of the secretary of the Transportation Cabinet, the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, the Speaker of the House, the President of the Senate, or their respective designated representatives, and nine (9) representatives of the motor carrier industry engaged in operations in the Commonwealth in the transportation of persons or property.

On July 15, 1990, the Governor shall appoint the motor carrier industry representative to the committee. Members shall be appointed by the Governor for three (3) years, except that initial appointments to the board shall be staggered in the following manner:

Three (3) members shall serve for a period of one (1) year;

Three (3) members shall serve for a period of two (2) years; and

Three (3) members shall serve for a period of three (3) years.

Motor carrier industry representatives of the committee shall qualify for membership by taking the constitutional oath of office and shall be provided with certificates of appointments. The members of the committee shall serve without per diem or compensation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 107, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 486, § 34, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 194, § 62, effective July 15, 1996; 2005, ch. 85, § 674, effective June 20, 2005.

281.905.
Duties — Meetings — Chairman — Annual report.

The duties of the committee shall be to advise the executive and legislative branches of government of the Commonwealth on issues regarding industrial expansion, promotion of motor carrier development, safety training, and improvement of motor carrier taxation and regulation methods.

The committee may request information and data from agencies of state government and may conduct studies to assist in the performance of its functions and duties.

The committee shall meet no less than quarterly during each calendar year, but may meet more frequently, if required. Meetings may be held at any place within the Commonwealth as determined by the committee. The Transportation Cabinet shall provide meeting facilities and administrative assistance and support to the committee and the expense of operations of the committee shall be paid from the budget of the Department of Vehicle Regulation.

The chairman of the committee shall be the secretary of the Transportation Cabinet, or his designee. The vice chairman shall be elected from the nine (9) appointed members of the committee. A majority of the membership of the committee shall constitute a quorum for the conduct of business.

The meetings of the committee shall be public and the board shall file annual reports of its activities, findings, and recommendations with the office of the Secretary of State and the Legislative Research Commission. The reports shall be a matter of public record.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 107, § 2, effective July 13, 1990; 2013, ch. 108, § 2, effective June 25, 2013; 2015 ch. 19, § 44, effective June 24, 2015.

281.907.
Educational training courses for motor carriers — Certification of providers — Fees — Records. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 108, § 1, effective June 25, 2013; repealed by 2015 ch. 19, § 45, effective June 24, 2015.